Massachusetts, session 194th, S1823.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the phrase "duties assigned to them" the following words:-
"employees of Holyoke and Chelsea Soldiers' Homes employed as registered nurses, licensed
practical nurses, certified nursing assistants, recreational therapists, physical therapy assistants,
and any direct care workers who have provided services at any time for those suffering from
mental health issues in a locked unit".
of 1